Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5847.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10ii. (1) The commission shall require each electric utility or natural gas utility that has critical infrastructure to demonstrate each of the following: (a) That the critical infrastructure has security measures in place to protect that infrastructure against cyber or physical threats. (b) That the electric utility or natural gas utility maintains a risk-based program to identify, assess, and mitigate cyber and physical risks to critical infrastructure. (2) An electric or natural gas utility may apply to the commission to recover costs for investments made to critical infrastructure under subsection (1) through a security recovery factor. If the commission approves a security recovery factor under subsection (4), the electric utility or natural gas utility may recover those enhanced security costs. (3) The commission shall require that an electric utility or natural gas utility publish the notice of the application filed under subsection (2) not later than 14 days after the date the application was filed. The commission shall hold the initial hearing not later than 60 days after the date the notice was published in newspapers of general circulation in the service territory of the electric utility or natural gas utility. (4) The commission may issue an order approving, rejecting, or modifying the security recovery factor. If the commission issues an order approving a security recovery factor, that commission shall issue the order within 180 days after the initial hearing required under subsection (3). In determining the security recovery factor, the commission shall only include costs that the commission determines are reasonable and prudent and that are jurisdictionally assigned to retail customers of the electric utility or natural gas utility in this state. (5) The commission shall by order prescribe the form for the filing of an application for a security recovery factor under subsection (2). If the commission or its designee determines that a filing is incomplete, it shall notify the electric utility or natural gas utility within 30 days after the filing. (6) Records or other information supplied by the electric utility or natural gas utility in an application for recovery of security costs under subsection (2) that describe security measures, vulnerabilities, or protective systems are exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and must be treated as confidential by the commission. (7) The commission shall issue protective orders as are necessary to protect the information found by the commission to be confidential under this section. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Critical infrastructure" means electric and natural gas utility infrastructure the commission considers necessary to provide safe and reliable service to customers. (b) "Security costs" means reasonable and prudent costs of new and enhanced security measures incurred after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section for investments made to critical infrastructure under subsection (1) by an electric utility or natural gas utility that have been determined to be necessary by the commission to provide reasonable security from cyber or physical threats to critical infrastructure. (c) "Security recovery factor" means an unbundled charge for all retail customers, except for customers of alternative electric suppliers, to recover security costs that have been approved by the commission.